District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.05

District of Columbia Taxicab Commission-Membership; appointment; terms; chairperson.

(a)

The Commission shall consist of 9 members. Five of the members, who shall be public members, shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, and shall be drawn from the public at large. Three of the members, who shall be industry members, shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council, and shall have experience in the field of transportation administration or regulation, the hospitality industry, public safety, or taxicab management or operations in the District. The remaining member of the Commission shall be appointed by the Mayor with advice and consent of the Council and shall serve as chairperson of the Commission. The chairperson shall have experience in the field of transportation administration or regulation. The Mayor shall transmit to the Council, for a 90-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess, a nominee for member or chairperson. If the Council does not approve the nomination by resolution within this 90-day review period, the nomination shall be deemed disapproved.

(b)

All members of the Commission, except for the chairperson who shall serve at the pleasure of the Mayor, shall be appointed for terms of 5 years.

(c)

(1)

Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of a successor. No member shall serve more than 2 consecutive terms, which shall not include an appointment to fill a vacancy due to removal, resignation, or death of a member. The Mayor may remove any member for cause, except for the chairperson who shall serve at the pleasure of the Mayor. An appointment to fill a vacancy occurring during a term due to removal, resignation or death of a member shall be made in the same manner as other appointments and for the remainder of the unexpired term. Public and industry members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to § 1-611.08(c-2)(3).

(2)

Public and industry members of the Commission may be compensated for physically attending official meetings of the Commission or a Panel of the Commission convened in accordance with Title 31 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; provided, that the compensation has been approved by the Chairperson. To be entitled to compensation, members shall:

(A)

Be present for roll call at the beginning and the end of Commission and Panel meetings; and

(B)

Personally sign-in at the beginning and sign-out at the end of Commission and Panel meetings.

(d)

Pursuant to § 1-604.06 and subchapter IX of Chapter 6 of Title 1, the chairperson of the Commission shall be its chief administrative officer and shall have charge of the organization of the Commission and its panels, and shall superintend the duties of the Commission staff in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this subchapter. The chairperson shall be a public officer of the District who shall devote full time to the affairs of the Commission, and shall receive compensation commensurate with his or her duties and responsibilities established by this subchapter. The salary of the chairperson shall be determined by the Mayor.

(e)

The Chairperson of the Commission shall appoint the Secretary to the Commission.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 6, 33 DCR 703
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-165, § 3(b), 33 DCR 6705
Oct. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 7-31, § 7, 34 DCR 3789
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 501(a), 43 DCR 4569
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(f), 46 DCR 1355
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2602(a), 49 DCR 6968
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(e), 59 DCR 9431
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 317, 62 DCR 1884

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-611.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1705.
2001 Ed., § 50-305.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (c), designated par. (1) and in that paragraph substituted “pursuant to § 1-611.08(c)(2)(K)” for “pursuant to § 1-612.08(b)”; and added par. (2).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184, in (a), substituted “the field of transportation administration or regulation, the hospitality industry, public safety, or taxicab management or operations” for “taxicab industry operations” in the second sentence, and deleted the last sentence; substituted “Commission staff” for “Chief of the Office” in (d); and added (e).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 substituted “pursuant to § 1-611.08(c-2)(3)” for “pursuant to § 1-611.08(c)(2)(K)” in (c)(1).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 501(a) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 501(a) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-302, July 25, 1996, 43 DCR 4181), § 501(a) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-429, October 29, 1996, 43 DCR 6151), and § 501(a) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 4(f) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2502(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 317 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 317 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Short Title

Short title of title XXVI of Law 14-190: Section 2601 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XXVI of the act may be cited as the Taxicab Driver Security Revolving Fund Amendment Act of 2002.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Effective Dates

Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to appoint Commission prior to effective date: Section 24(c) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that prior to the effective date specified in § 24(b) (1 year after March 25, 1986), the Mayor is authorized to appoint the members and chairperson of the Commission. Upon confirmation, the chairperson is authorized to appoint the Chief and approve the hiring of the staff of the Office. Following confirmation of a majority of their members, the Commission panels are authorized to issue internal operating procedures and otherwise organize the Commission in preparation for the performance of duties under the act.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.